District of Columbia statutes.
42-3202

Notices to quit.

A tenancy from month to month, or from quarter to quarter, may be terminated by a 30 days notice in writing from the landlord to the tenant to quit, or by such a notice from the tenant to the landlord of his intention to quit, said notice to expire, in either case, on the day of the month from which such tenancy commenced to run.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1382, ch. 854, § 1219
Alterations to units after notice to vacate, prohibition, see § 6-731.01 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 45-1402.
1973 Ed., § 45-902.